Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 20. Parent and Child.
Sec. 25.20.115.
Attorney fee awards in custody and visitation matters.

In an action to modify, vacate, or enforce that part of an order providing for custody of a child or visitation with a child, the court may, upon request of a party, award attorney fees and costs of the action. In awarding attorney fees and costs under this section, the court shall consider the relative financial resources of the parties and whether the parties have acted in good faith.

History.

(§ 3 ch 130 SLA 1990)

Sec. 25.20.120.
Closure of custody proceedings and records.

At any stage of a proceeding involving custody of a child the court may, if it is in the best interests of the child, close the proceeding to the public or order the court records closed to the public temporarily or permanently.
The court may modify or vacate an order under this section at any time.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Sec. 25.20.130.
Access to records of the child.

A parent who is not granted custody under AS

25.20.060

—

25.20.130

has the same access to the medical, dental, school, and other records of the child as the custodial parent.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1982)

Sec. 25.20.140.
Action for failure to permit visitation with minor child.

When a court order is specific as to when a custodian of a minor child must permit another person to have visitation with that child, and the custodian fails, wilfully and without just excuse, to permit visitation with the child in substantial conformance with the court order, the person entitled to visitation has a separate cause of action against the custodian for damages.

The amount of damages recoverable under this section is $200 for each failure of the custodian, wilfully and without just excuse, to permit visitation with the child for substantially the length of time and substantially in the same manner as specified in the court order. This amount may not be increased or decreased once liability has been established. The custodian is not liable for more than one failure in respect to what is, under the court order, a single continuous period of visitation. The prevailing party in an action commenced under this section is entitled to recover a reasonable attorney fee.

As used in this section,

“court order” means a decree, judgment, or order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;

“custodian” means a natural person who has been awarded custody, either temporary or permanent, of a minor child;

“just excuse” includes illness of the child which makes it dangerous to the health of the child for visitation to take place in conformance with the court order; “just excuse” does not include the wish of the child not to have visitation with the person entitled to it.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 9 ch 94 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.55.238

. Renumbered as AS

25.24.300

in 1983. Renumbered again in 1991.

Cross references. —

For crime of failure to permit visitation, see AS

11.51.125

.